Nebraska, session 109, LB820A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $7,500 from the Class V
School Employees Retirement System Management Work Plan Fund and $7,500 from
the State Patrol Expense Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $-0- from the Class V
School Employees Retirement System Management Work Plan Fund and $-0- from the
State Patrol Expense Fund for FY2027-28 to the Public Employees Retirement
Board, for Program 41, to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative
Bill 820, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-